Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 10 Crime Against Nature

11-10-1.
Abominable and detestable crime against nature.

Every person who shall be convicted of the abominable and detestable crime against nature, with any beast, shall be imprisoned not exceeding twenty (20) years nor less than seven (7) years.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 281, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 347, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 399, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 610, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

11-10-1

; P.L. 1998, ch. 24, § 1.